Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 3 MOTOR VEHICLE DRIVER’S LICENSES
§ 49-306. Application for driver’s license, instruction permit, commercial learner’s permit or restricted school attendance driving permit.

Every application for any instruction permit, restricted school attendance driving permit, or for a driver’s license shall be made upon a form furnished by the department and shall be verified by the applicant before a person authorized to administer oaths. Officers and employees of the department, agents authorized by the department, and sheriffs and their deputies are authorized to administer the oaths without charge. Every application for a permit, extension or driver’s license shall be accompanied by the following fee, none of which is refundable:

Class A, B, C (4-year) license with endorsements — age 21
years and older ............................... $40.00

Class A, B, C (3-year) license with endorsements — age 18 to
21 years ............................... $30.00

Class A, B, C (1-year) license with endorsements — age 20
years ............................... $15.00

Class D (3-year) license — under age 18 years ............................... $25.00

Class D (3-year) license — age 18 to 21 years ............................... $25.00

Class D (1-year) license — age 17 years or age 20 years ............................... $15.00

Four-year Class D license — age 21 years and older ............................... $30.00

Eight-year Class D license — age 21 to 63 years ............................... $55.00

Commercial learner’s permit ............................... $29.00

Class D instruction permit or supervised instruction permit ............................... $15.00

Duplicate driver’s license or permit issued under section
49-318, Idaho Code ............................... $15.00

Driver’s license extension issued under section 49-319,
Idaho Code ............................... $10.00

License classification change (upgrade) ............................... $25.00

Endorsement addition ............................... $15.00

Class A, B, C skills tests not more than ............................... $200.00

Class D skills test not more than ............................... $35.00

Motorcycle endorsement skills test not more than ............................... $25.00

Knowledge test ............................... $ 3.00

Seasonal driver’s license ............................... $39.00

Onetime motorcycle “M” endorsement ............................... $15.00

Motorcycle endorsement instruction permit ............................... $15.00

Restricted driving permit or restricted school attendance
driving permit ............................... $60.00

A person who applies for a driver’s license or a driver’s license renewal may designate a voluntary contribution of two dollars ($2.00) for the purpose of promoting and supporting organ donation. Such a contribution shall be treated as a voluntary contribution to the organ donation contribution fund created in section 49-2447, Idaho Code, and not as a driver’s license fee.
(3) Every application shall state the true and full name, date of birth, sex, declaration of Idaho residency, Idaho residence address and mailing address, if different, of the applicant, height, weight, hair color, and eye color, and the applicant’s social security number as verified by the social security administration. If an applicant has submitted an application pursuant to the provisions of chapter 58, title 19, Idaho Code, then the applicant may state, in his or her application pursuant to this section, the applicant’s alternative Idaho mailing address in place of his or her Idaho residence address and mailing address. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 49-303(13), Idaho Code, an applicant for a nondomiciled class A, B or C driver’s license or nondomiciled commercial learner’s permit having residency in a state that is prohibited from issuing class A, B or C driver’s licenses or commercial learner’s permits, as provided in 49 CFR 384, is excepted from providing proof of Idaho residency and an Idaho mailing address.

The requirement that an applicant provide a social security number as verified by the social security administration shall apply only to applicants who have been assigned a social security number.

An applicant who has not been assigned a social security number shall:

Present written verification from the social security administration that the applicant has not been assigned a social security number; and

Submit a birth certificate, passport or other documentary evidence issued by an entity other than a state or the United States; and

Submit such proof as the department may require that the applicant is lawfully present in the United States.

Every application for a class A, B or C license shall state where the applicant has been licensed for the preceding ten (10) years and under which of the following driving categories the applicant will operate:

Non-excepted interstate. The applicant operates or expects to operate in interstate commerce, and is required to provide a medical examiner’s certificate;

Excepted interstate. The applicant operates or expects to operate in interstate commerce, but engages exclusively in transportation or operations excepted by the federal motor carrier safety administration from all or parts of the qualification requirements of federal motor carrier safety regulation 49, part 391, and is therefore not required to provide a medical examiner’s certificate;

Non-excepted intrastate. The applicant operates only in intrastate commerce and is subject to and meets all Idaho driver qualification requirements and the applicable parts of federal motor carrier safety regulation 49, part 391, and is required to provide a medical examiner’s certificate; or

Excepted intrastate. The applicant operates in intrastate commerce, but engages exclusively in exempted transportation or operations as listed in section 67-2901B(2), Idaho Code, and the applicable parts of federal motor carrier safety regulation 49, part 391, and is therefore not required to provide a medical examiner’s certificate.

Deposit an amount up to twenty-five dollars ($25.00) from each fee for a motorcycle endorsement skills test in the current expense fund; provided however, if a contractor administers the skills test he shall be entitled to the entire fee;

Remit the remainder to the state treasurer; and

Deposit up to twenty-eight dollars and fifty cents ($28.50 from each fee for a class D skills test into the county current expense fund, unless the test is administered by a department-approved contractor, in which case the contractor shall be entitled to up to twenty-eight dollars and fifty cents ($28.50 of each fee.

Five dollars and thirty cents ($5.30) of each fee for a four-year class D driver’s license, and ten dollars and sixty cents ($10.60) of each fee for an eight-year class D driver’s license, and four dollars ($4.00) of each fee charged for a license pursuant to subsection (1)(d) and (e) of this section, and one dollar and thirty-three cents ($1.33) of each fee charged for a license pursuant to subsection (1)(f) of this section shall be deposited in the driver training account;
(h) Twelve dollars and seventy cents ($12.70) of each fee for a four-year class D driver’s license, and twenty dollars and forty cents ($20.40) of each fee for an eight-year class D driver’s license, and ten dollars and fifty cents ($10.50) of each fee charged for a license pursuant to subsection (1)(d) and (e) of this section, and six dollars and eighty-three cents ($6.83) of each fee charged for a license pursuant to subsection (1)(f) of this section shall be deposited in the highway distribution account;

Two dollars and sixty cents ($2.60) of each fee for a class D instruction permit, duplicate class D license or permit, and class D license extension shall be deposited in the driver training account;

A driver’s license, commercial learner’s permit or any instruction permit issued on and after January 1, 1993, shall not contain an applicant’s social security number. Applications on file shall be exempt from disclosure except as provided in sections 49-202, 49-203, 49-203A and 49-204, Idaho Code.

All applications shall also state whether the applicant has previously been licensed as a driver, and if so, when and by what state or country, and whether a driver’s license or privileges have ever been suspended, revoked, denied, disqualified, canceled or whether an application has ever been refused, and if so, the date of and reason for the suspension, revocation, denial, disqualification, cancellation or refusal and the applicant’s oath that all information is correct as signified by the applicant’s signature.
(d) The applicant must submit proof of identity acceptable to the examiner or the department and date of birth as set forth in a certified copy of his birth certificate. When a certified copy of his birth certificate or a delayed birth certificate is impossible to obtain from a vital statistics agency, another government-issued document may be submitted that provides satisfactory evidence of a person’s full legal name and date of birth acceptable to the examiner or the department.

(e) Every applicant for a class A, B or C driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit shall provide proof of United States citizenship or lawful permanent residency in the United States upon application for issuance, transfer, upgrade or renewal, unless the applicant’s driving record already contains documentation confirming United States citizenship or lawful permanent residency. Every applicant for a nondomiciled class A, B or C driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit domiciled in a foreign country must provide an unexpired employment authorization document issued by the department of homeland security or an unexpired foreign passport accompanied by an approved I-94 form documenting the applicant’s most recent admittance into the United States.

(f) Individuals required to register in compliance with section 3 of the federal military selective service act, 50 U.S.C. App. 451 et seq., as amended, shall be provided an opportunity to fulfill such registration requirements in conjunction with an application for a driver’s license, commercial learner’s permit or instruction permit. Any registration information so supplied shall be transmitted by the department to the selective service system.

(4) Whenever an application is received from a person previously licensed in another jurisdiction, the department shall request a copy of the driver’s record from the other jurisdiction and shall contact the national driver register. When received, the driver’s record from the previous jurisdiction shall become a part of the driver’s record in this state with the same force and effect as though entered on the driver’s record in this state in the original instance.

(5) Whenever the department receives a request for a driver’s record from another licensing jurisdiction, the record shall be forwarded without charge.

(6) The department shall contact and notify the commercial driver license information system of the proposed application for a class A, B or C driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit to ensure identification of the person and to obtain clearance to issue the license.

(7) When the fees required under this section are collected by a county officer, they shall, except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, be paid over to the county treasurer not less often than monthly, who shall immediately:

(a) Deposit an amount equal to five dollars ($5.00) from each driver’s license except an eight-year class D license, or any class D instruction permit application fees, application for a duplicate driver’s license or permit, classification change, seasonal driver’s license and additional endorsement, and ten dollars ($10.00) from each eight-year class D driver’s license, in the current expense fund;

(b) Deposit two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) from each motorcycle endorsement and motorcycle endorsement instruction permit fee in the current expense fund;

(c) Deposit an amount equal to three dollars ($3.00) from each fee for a knowledge test in the current expense fund;

(8) When the fees required under this section are collected by the department or an agent authorized by the department, they shall be paid over to the state treasurer. When the department or an agent authorized by the department collects the fees required under this section, the portion of fees to be retained by the county shall be retained by the issuing authorized agent.

(9) The state treasurer shall distribute the moneys received from fees imposed by the provisions of this section, whether collected by a county officer or by a state officer or agency as follows:

(a) Two dollars ($2.00) of each fee for a four-year driver’s license or seasonal driver’s license, and four dollars ($4.00) of each fee for an eight-year class D driver’s license, and one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) of each fee charged for driver’s licenses pursuant to subsection (1)(b), (d) and (e) of this section, and fifty cents (50¢) of each fee charged for driver’s licenses pursuant to subsection (1)(c) and (f) of this section shall be deposited in the emergency medical services fund II created in section 56-1018A, Idaho Code, and four dollars ($4.00) of each fee charged pursuant to subsection (1)(a), (g) and (s) of this section and eight dollars ($8.00) of each fee charged pursuant to subsection (1)(h) of this section and three dollars ($3.00) of each fee for driver’s licenses pursuant to subsection (1)(b), (d) and (e) of this section, and one dollar ($1.00) of each fee charged for driver’s licenses pursuant to subsection (1)(c) and (f) of this section shall be deposited in the emergency medical services fund III created in section 56-1018B, Idaho Code;

(b) Twenty-eight dollars ($28.00) of each fee for a seasonal or class A, B or C driver’s license, and nineteen dollars and fifty cents ($19.50) of each fee charged for a license pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, and eight dollars and sixteen cents ($8.16) of each fee charged for a license pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be deposited in the state highway account;

(c) Twenty dollars ($20.00) of each fee for a commercial learner’s permit or driver’s license classification change shall be deposited in the state highway account;

(d) Four dollars ($4.00) of each fee for a commercial learner’s permit shall be deposited in the emergency medical services fund III created in section 56-1018B, Idaho Code;

(e) Ten dollars ($10.00) of each fee for a duplicate seasonal or class A, B or C driver’s license, class A, B or C driver’s license extension, or additional endorsement shall be deposited in the state highway account;

(f) Seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) of each fee for a motorcycle endorsement and motorcycle endorsement instruction permit shall be deposited in the state highway account;

(j) Seven dollars and forty cents ($7.40) of each fee for a class D instruction permit, duplicate class D license or permit, and class D license extension shall be deposited in the highway distribution account;

(k) Ten dollars ($10.00) of each fee for a class A, B or C skills test shall be deposited in the state highway account;

(
l
) One dollar ($1.00) of each fee for a class A, B, C or four-year D driver’s license, and two dollars ($2.00) of each fee for an eight-year class D driver’s license, and one dollar ($1.00) of each fee charged for a license pursuant to subsection (1)(b), (d) and (e) of this section, and thirty-four cents (34¢) of each fee charged for a license pursuant to subsection (1)(c) and (f) of this section shall be deposited in the motorcycle safety program fund established in section 33-4904, Idaho Code;

(m) Six dollars and fifty cents ($6.50) of each fee for a class D skills test shall be deposited into the state highway account; and

(n) Each voluntary contribution of two dollars ($2.00) as described in subsection (2) of this section, less actual administrative costs associated with collecting and transferring such contributions, shall be deposited into the organ donation contribution fund created in section 49-2447, Idaho Code.

(10) The contractor administering a class A, B or C skills test shall be entitled to not more than one hundred ninety dollars ($190) of the skills test fee. A contractor administering a class A, B or C skills test may collect an additional fee for the use of the contractor’s vehicle for the skills test.

(11) Sixty dollars ($60.00) of each restricted driving permit and each restricted school attendance driving permit shall be deposited in the state highway account.

(12) The department may issue seasonal class B or C driver’s licenses to drivers who are employees of agri-chemical businesses, custom harvesters, farm retail outlets and suppliers, and livestock feeders that:

(a) Will only be valid for driving commercial vehicles that normally require class B or C commercial driver’s licenses;

(b) Will be valid for seasonal periods that begin on the date of issuance and that are not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days in a twelve (12) month period;

(c) May only be obtained twice in a driver’s lifetime;

(d) Are valid only within a one hundred fifty (150) mile radius of the place of business or farm being serviced; and

(e) Will be valid only in conjunction with valid Idaho class D driver’s licenses.

(13) The department may issue seasonal class B or C driver’s licenses to drivers who:

(a) Have not violated the single license provisions of applicable federal regulations;

(b) Have not had any license suspensions, revocations or cancellations;

(c) Have not had any convictions in any vehicle for any offense listed in section 49-335(1) or (2), Idaho Code, or any one (1) serious traffic offense;

(d) Have at least one (1) year of driving experience with a class D or equivalent license in any type motor vehicle; and

(e) Are at least sixteen (16) years old.

§ 49-307. Class D driver’s training instruction permit — Class D supervised instruction permit — Application for a class D driver’s license — Restrictions on class D driver’s license.

No enrollee of any class D driver’s training course shall be allowed to attend classes or participate in driving instruction unless he has obtained a class D driver’s training instruction permit, or a class D instruction permit as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

Every enrollee of a class D driver’s training course shall pay a nonrefundable fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00). Five dollars ($5.00) of each fee so imposed shall be deposited in the state highway account, five dollars ($5.00) shall be deposited in the county current expense fund, and five dollars ($5.00) shall be:

Deposited in the driver training account if the person is taking driver’s training from a public school; or

Paid to the bureau of occupational licenses and deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the occupational licenses fund if the person is taking driver’s training from a private driver’s training program. The amount to be remitted to the bureau of occupational licenses shall be annually calculated and paid. To calculate such amount, the total number of public driver’s training students as submitted to the state department of education shall be subtracted from the total number of permits sold as reported by the Idaho transportation department, and the resulting number shall be multiplied by five dollars ($5.00).

Each enrollee of a class D driver’s training course shall provide the type of information required for a driver’s license or instruction permit. If an enrollee of a class D driver’s training course cannot provide a certified copy of his birth certificate at the time of application for a permit, the department may issue a class D driver’s training instruction permit or a class D instruction permit upon receipt of identification acceptable to the department. The certified copy of an applicant’s birth certificate shall be required before a class D driver’s license will be issued.

The class D driver’s training instruction permit shall expire five (5) days after the permittee’s eighteenth birthday for permittees fourteen and one-half (14 ½) years of age through seventeen and one-half (17 ½) years of age. The class D driver’s training instruction permit shall expire one hundred eighty (180) days from the date of issue for persons seventeen and one-half (17 ½) years of age or older. Persons aged seventeen (17) years or older may attend classes or participate in driver’s training instruction while operating with a class D instruction permit or a class D driver’s training instruction permit.

The class D driver’s training instruction permit shall be issued to the instructor of the course.

Class D supervised instruction permit.

Upon successful completion of the class D driver’s training course, the driver’s training instructor shall submit the student log to the county driver’s license office and give the class D driver’s training instruction permit to the parent or legal guardian of the permittee, and the parent or legal guardian shall assume responsibility for ensuring that the permittee complies with the requirements of operating a vehicle with a class D supervised instruction permit. The class D driver’s training instruction permit shall then serve as a class D supervised instruction permit.
(b) In the event the permittee reaches the age of seventeen (17) years while operating a class D vehicle with a class D supervised instruction permit, the supervised instruction permit shall become a class D instruction permit.

No permittee may apply for a class D driver’s license sooner than fifteen (15) years of age and no sooner than six (6) months after completing a class D driver’s training course, during which time the permittee shall satisfy all requirements for operation of a class D vehicle with a class D supervised instruction permit as follows:

The permittee shall not operate a vehicle unless he is accompanied by a driver who holds a valid driver’s license, is twenty-one (21) years of age or older, and who is actually occupying a seat beside the permittee driver. The supervising driver and the permittee shall be the only occupants of the front passenger section of the vehicle.

Over a period of time not less than six (6) months, the permittee shall accumulate at least fifty (50) hours of supervised driving time, ten (10) hours of which shall be during hours of darkness.

The permit shall be in the permittee’s immediate possession at all times while operating a vehicle.

In addition to the permittee driver and the supervising driver, all other occupants of the vehicle shall wear a seat belt or be restrained by child passenger restraints as required by law.

The permittee is subject to the provisions of sections 18-1502 and 18-8004, Idaho Code, relating to violation of age restrictions on consumption of beer, wine, and alcohol and driving under the influence of alcohol, drugs or any other intoxicating substances, respectively.

The permittee shall not have been convicted of any moving traffic violation, or have had driving privileges suspended by the department or the court for any offense, or found to be in violation of any of the restrictions on the class D supervised instruction permit, for a period of at least six (6) months from the date the driver’s training instructor gave the permit to the parent or legal guardian, or from the date a canceled class D supervised instruction permit was reissued, or until the permittee reaches seventeen (17) years of age.

If the permittee is under seventeen (17) years of age and is convicted of a violation of any traffic law, or section 18-1502, 18-8004 or 23-949, Idaho Code, or is found to be in violation of any of the restrictions on the class D supervised instruction permit, the department shall cancel the class D supervised instruction permit, and the cancellation shall not be used to establish rates of motor vehicle insurance charged by a casualty insurer. If the permittee is under seventeen (17) years of age, the permittee may reapply for and be issued a new class D supervised instruction permit upon payment of the appropriate fee, and shall again be required to operate with the class D supervised instruction permit for at least six (6) months from the date of reissue without a conviction or suspension, accumulate the required hours of driving time and adhere to the requirements as specified in paragraphs (a) through (f) of this subsection.

Upon completion of the requirements in subsection (7) of this section, the permittee shall take the knowledge test and skills test administered by a person certified by the Idaho transportation department to administer knowledge and skills tests.

Upon passage of the knowledge and skills tests, the permittee may apply for a class D driver’s license with driving privileges restricted to daylight hours for persons under sixteen (16) years of age, and with full privileges at sixteen (16) years of age or older. Provided however, the restriction on daylight hours only driving privileges for persons under sixteen (16) years of age shall not apply if:
(a) The person under sixteen (16) years of age has a valid class D driver’s license; and

Upon passage of the knowledge and skills tests, the permittee may apply for a class D driver’s license. Any such licensee who is under the age of seventeen (17) years shall be required, during the first six (6) months from the date of issue of the class D driver’s license, to limit the number of passengers in the vehicle who are under the age of seventeen (17) years to not more than one (1) such passenger. Provided however, the limit of one (1) passenger under the age of seventeen (17) years shall not apply to passengers who are related to the driver by blood, adoption or marriage.

(b) Is accompanied by a driver who holds a valid driver’s license and is twenty-one (21) years of age or older and is actually occupying a seat beside the licensee who is under sixteen (16) years of age; and

(c) The two (2) licensed drivers are the only occupants of the front passenger section of the vehicle.

The restriction of daylight hours only shall mean that period of time one-half (½) hour before sunrise to one-half (½) hour after sunset.

§ 49-307A. Restricted school attendance driving permit.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter applying to licenses or permits, and notwithstanding the minimum age requirement for a driver training course specified in section 33-1703, Idaho Code, other than those provisions specifically applying to restricted school attendance driving permits:

The department may issue a restricted school attendance driving permit to a minor fourteen (14) years of age, but less than sixteen (16) years of age, provided the following:

The minor resides in an Idaho school district with a population of less than one hundred fifty (150) people;

The minor attends an educational program as identified in section 49-303A, Idaho Code, and complies with the provisions of section 49-303A, Idaho Code, including submission of verification of attendance compliance by the school district to the department; and

There is no school bus service provided to transport the minor to and from school, as verified by the school district to the department.

The permit, if issued, shall only entitle the minor to drive to and from school, and school sponsored activities occurring at the school where enrolled, between the hours of 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 p.m.

The minor must have completed a driver training course and comply with section 49-310, Idaho Code, as a condition of issuance of a permit pursuant to the provisions of this section.

The restricted school attendance driving permit shall be canceled for conviction of any traffic offense and shall not be reissued.

In the event the student terminates their school enrollment in the district in which they have qualified for a restricted school attendance driving permit, the permit shall be canceled.

§ 49-308. Driver training account established.

The driver training account is established in the office of the state treasury, which account is continuously appropriated for the purpose of driver training. All disbursements for driver training purposes made under certificate of the state board of education shall be made from the driver training account.

§ 49-309. Chauffeur’s license

Application. [Repealed.]

§ 49-310. Applications of persons under the age of eighteen years.

The application of any person under the age of eighteen (18) years for any class D instruction permit, restricted driver’s license, restricted school attendance driving permit, driver training instruction permit or driver’s license shall be signed and verified before a person authorized to administer oaths by either the father or mother of the applicant, if both are living and have custody of him; or if either be dead, then by the surviving parent who has custody of him; or by the Idaho resident host of a foreign exchange student, or in the event neither parent is living, or if living and does not have the custody of the applicant, then by the person or guardian having such custody, with verifiable custody or guardianship documents, or by an employer of the applicant. In the event there is no guardian or employer, then some other responsible person willing to assume the obligation for the applicant may sign the application. Any person who signs the applicant’s application shall attest that the applicant is in compliance with the school attendance provisions of section 49-303A, Idaho Code. When the minor person applies for a class D driver’s license, a parent or guardian or a person authorized by the parent or guardian shall attest that the minor person has satisfied the requirements and conditions applicable to the class D supervised instruction permit pursuant to section 49-307, Idaho Code. The person willing to assume responsibility for the applicant must be at least eighteen (18) years of age. When signing for a restricted school attendance driving permit, the person signing the applicant’s application shall attest that the conditions set forth within section 49-307A, Idaho Code, are met. Each application for a restricted school attendance driving permit shall also be signed by the local county sheriff, the president of the board of trustees of the local school district, and the school principal of the applicant’s school, verifying that the conditions set forth within section 49-307A, Idaho Code, are met.

Any negligence or willful misconduct of a person under the age of eighteen (18) years when operating a motor vehicle upon a highway shall be imputed to the person who signed the application of that person for a permit or driver’s license, and that person shall be jointly and severally liable with the permit or driver’s license holder for any damage caused by negligence or willful misconduct, except as otherwise provided by law.

In the event a permit or driver’s license holder under the age of eighteen (18) years maintains, or there is maintained upon his behalf, proof of financial responsibility as required under the motor vehicle financial responsibility laws of this state, or by the director if the form and amount is not fixed by law, then the department may accept the application when signed by one (1) parent or guardian of the applicant, and while that proof is maintained, the parent or guardian shall not be subject to liability for the negligence or willful misconduct of the person under the age of eighteen (18) years, as imposed under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Any person who has signed the application of a minor for a permit or driver’s license shall be liable civilly for the payment of any court penalty imposed because the minor has been found to have committed an infraction violation. The provisions of this section shall not apply or create any civil liability for the person signing the application in connection with any pedestrian, bicycle, or electric-assisted bicycle infraction, and provided this subsection shall not apply to any civil action where the plaintiff is other than the state of Idaho.

§ 49-311. Release from liability.

Any person who has signed the application for a driver’s license of a person under the age of eighteen (18) years may file with the department a verified written request that the driver’s license so granted be cancelled and the department shall cancel the driver’s license. The person who signed the application shall be relieved from the liability imposed by reason of having signed the application, of any subsequent negligence or willful misconduct of the person signed for in operating a motor vehicle.

§ 49-312. Death of person signing application for person under eighteen years of age.

The department, upon receipt of satisfactory evidence of the death of the person(s) who signed the application of a person under the age of eighteen (18) years for a driver’s license, shall cancel the driver’s license and shall not issue a new driver’s license until a new application, duly signed and verified, is made. This provision shall not apply in the event the licensee has attained the age of eighteen (18) years.

§ 49-312A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-313. Examination of applicants.

The sheriff, his deputy or authorized agents of the department shall examine every applicant for an instruction permit, commercial learner’s permit, restricted school attendance driving permit, seasonal driver’s license, driver’s license or a motorcycle endorsement, except as otherwise provided by law. The examination shall include a vision screening and a test of the applicant’s ability to read and understand highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic. A skills test shall be required for an applicant who has not been previously licensed for the class of license requested, or who holds a license issued by another country unless a reciprocal agreement is in force. However, a skills test may be required for any and all other applicants at the discretion of the examiner or department for a class A, B, C or D driver’s license or a motorcycle endorsement. In addition, the applicant’s knowledge of traffic laws of this state and when a motorcycle endorsement is applied for, the applicant’s knowledge of safe motorcycle operating practices and traffic laws specifically relating to motorcycle operation shall be tested by a written examination, except as provided in section 49-319, Idaho Code. At the discretion of the examiner, the prescribed written examination may be conducted orally.

The knowledge and skills examinations for applicants for driver’s licenses in class A, B or C shall be conducted in compliance with 49 CFR part 383.

The skills test for a class A, B, C or D driver’s license or for any endorsement shall be given by the department or its authorized agents. The skills examiner for a motorcycle endorsement shall be certified by the division of career technical education.

The department shall not issue the following endorsements except as provided:

A tank, double/triple trailer, or hazardous material endorsement unless the applicant, in addition to all other applicable qualifications, has passed an appropriate knowledge test.

A passenger endorsement unless the applicant, in addition to all other applicable qualifications, has passed an appropriate knowledge and skills test.

A school bus endorsement unless the applicant, in addition to all other applicable qualifications, has passed appropriate knowledge and skills tests. Until September 30, 2005, the department may waive the school bus endorsement skills test requirement if the applicant meets the conditions set forth in accordance with 49 CFR part [section] 383.123.

Any person failing to pass a knowledge or skills test for a class A, B, C or D driver’s license, or a knowledge test for a seasonal driver’s license, or any endorsement may not retake the test within three (3) calendar days of the failure.

Any person retaking a knowledge or skills test for a driver’s license shall pay the appropriate testing fee as specified in section 49-306, Idaho Code.

The motorcycle skills test for a motorcycle endorsement shall be waived by the department:

On and after September 1, 1998, if the applicant presents satisfactory evidence of successful completion of a recognized motorcycle rider training course approved by the division of career technical education;

On and after September 1, 1998, if the applicant presents evidence of a motorcycle endorsement on his current license by a state or province which requires a motorcycle skills test equivalent to that required by Idaho law as determined by the division of career technical education;

Until September 1, 1998.

At the discretion of the department, an alternate skills test for the motorcycle endorsement may be administered when the endorsement is for operation of a three-wheeled motorcycle only.

The department or its authorized agents may refuse to give an applicant a skills test if there are reasonable grounds to believe that the safety of the applicant, public, or the examiner would be jeopardized by doing so. Reasonable grounds would include, but not be limited to, the applicant’s inability to pass the vision screening, written tests, or a statement by a licensed physician stating the applicant is not physically able to drive a motor vehicle.

The department or its authorized agents may deny issuance or renewal of a driver’s license or endorsement to any applicant who does not meet the licensing requirements for the class of driver’s license or endorsement being renewed or issued.

Skills examinations for seasonal driver’s licenses shall be waived.

§ 49-314. Local examiners appointed by department.

The department shall appoint the sheriff in each county and may appoint any deputy sheriff, chief of police, or other officials or private citizens whom the department deems qualified as examiners, who shall be agents of the department and shall perform duties prescribed in this title.

The department shall appoint at least one (1) employee in the department who shall be skilled and highly qualified in the method of giving driver’s license examinations, who shall have authority, and it shall be this person’s duty to instruct the examiners appointed by the department in the method of giving driver’s license examinations and acquaint them with the use of equipment and forms needed in examining applicants for licensure.

Agents of the department appointed to administer skills tests for class A, B or C driver’s licenses must be certified according to 49 CFR part 383.

Agents of the department appointed to administer the skills test for a motorcycle endorsement shall be certified by the division of career technical education.

Agents of the department to administer skills tests for class D driver’s licenses shall be certified by the department.